Utah statutes.
59-12-1101.   Statewide purpose.
The Legislature finds that a statewide purpose is served by this part in that
it enables counties to carry out more effectively the counties' statutorily
defined roles as political and legal subdivisions of the state by improving
the counties' revenue raising capacities.
